Utah statutes.
4-20-1.6.   Regional Grazing Advisory Boards -- Duties.

(1)  The commissioner shall appoint members to a regional board for each grazing district from nominations submitted by:

(a)  the Utah Cattlemen's Association;

(b)  the Utah Woolgrower's Association;

(c)  the Utah Farm Bureau Federation; and

(d)  a conservation district, if the conservation district's boundaries include some portion of the grazing district.

(2)  Regional boards:

(a)  shall provide advice and recommendations to the state board; and

(b)  may receive money from the Rangeland Improvement Account created in Section 4-20-2.

(3)  If a regional board receives money as authorized by Subsection (2)(b), the regional board shall elect a treasurer to expend the money:

(a)  as directed by the regional board; and

(b)  in accordance with Section 4-20-3.

(4) (a)  A treasurer elected in accordance with Subsection (3) shall, for the faithful performance of the treasurer's official duties, file with the department:

(i)  a $5,000 corporate surety bond; or

(ii)  a $10,000 personal surety bond.

(b)  The regional board shall pay the premium for the bond required by Subsection (4)(a) from the money received under Subsection (2)(b).

